Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1515YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 352 Section 1. Section 68A.406, subsection 1, paragraphs d and 1 e, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 d. Vacant lots owned by a person who is not a prohibited 3 contributor under section 68A.503 in the business of selling 4 signage . 5 e. Property owned by an organization that is not a 6 prohibited contributor under section 68A.503 in the business 7 of selling signage . 8 Sec. 2. Section 68A.406, subsection 2, paragraph a, 9 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 (2) Property owned, leased, or occupied by a prohibited 11 contributor under section 68A.503 that is in the business of 12 selling signage, unless the sign advocates the passage or 13 defeat of a ballot issue or is exempted under subsection 1 . 14 Sec. 3. Section 68A.503, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. Placement of a campaign sign on 17 property owned, leased, or occupied by an insurance company, 18 savings association, bank, credit union, or corporation by the 19 insurance company, savings association, bank, credit union, or 20 corporation is not a contribution unless the insurance company, 21 savings association, bank, credit union, or corporation is in 22 the business of selling signage. 23